Wyoming statutes. Title 35 Public Health and Safety
Chapter 11 Environmental Quality

Reclamation costs deductible for severance tax purposes. —

Reclamation costs should be allowed as part of transportation and processing costs deducted from the value of coal for purposes of computing ad valorem and severance taxes. Amax Coal Co. v. Wyoming State Bd. of Equalization, 819 P.2d 825,

1991 Wyo. LEXIS 155

(Wyo. 1991).

Authority of board of county commissioners. —

Assuming extraction and production activities relate to minerals, the board of county commissioners cannot prohibit those activities, but it can regulate such activities so long as they are not regulated under the Wyoming Environmental Quality Act. River Springs Ltd. Liab. Co. v. Board of County Comm'rs, 899 P.2d 1329,

1995 Wyo. LEXIS 125

(Wyo. 1995).

A county can prohibit the extraction or processing of sand, gravel, rock, and limestone pursuant to its zoning authority, but a “grandfathered” use cannot be prohibited. River Springs Ltd. Liability Co. v. Board of County Comm'rs, 899 P.2d 1329,

1995 Wyo. LEXIS 125

(Wyo. 1995), reh'g denied,

1995 Wyo. LEXIS 142

(Wyo. Aug. 15, 1995).

If the county permits the extraction, production, or processing of sand, gravel, rock, or limestone, or must do so because the use was a preexisting use, then regulation of those activates is accomplished under the EQA by the DEQ. If, however, the DEQ, pursuant to an exception in the statute, does not regulate those activities, they may be regulated by the county in a way that does not conflict with state regulation. River Springs Ltd. Liability Co. v. Board of County Comm'rs, 899 P.2d 1329,

1995 Wyo. LEXIS 125

(Wyo. 1995), reh'g denied,

1995 Wyo. LEXIS 142

(Wyo. Aug. 15, 1995).

Law reviews. —

For article, “Industrial Siting Legislation: The Wyoming Industrial Development Information and Siting Act — Advance or Retreat?” see XI Land & Water L. Rev. 27 (1976).

For comment, “Hazardous Waste Cleanup in Wyoming: Legal Tools Available to the Private Citizen,” see XIX Land & Water L. Rev. 395 (1984).

For article, “Uranium Mine and Mill Tailings Reclamation in Wyoming — Ten Years After the Industry Collapsed,” see XXVI Land & Water L. Rev. 489 (1991).

For case note, “An Uncommonly Rare Decision—The Wyoming Supreme Court Orders Agency Rulemaking. In the Matter of Bessemer Mountain, Rissler v. Rissler & McMurray Co. v. Environmental Quality Council (In re Bessemer Mt.), 856 P.2d 450,

1993 Wyo. LEXIS 123

(Wyo. 1993),” see XXIX Land & Water L. Rev. 615 (1994).

For article, “Administrative Law: Rulemaking and Contested Case Practice in Wyoming,” see XXXI Land & Water L. Rev. 685 (1996).

For article, “A Guide to Air Quality Operating Permits in Wyoming,” see XXXI Land & Water L. Rev. 713 (1996).

For case note, “Mining Law — Gravel Extraction — Is Control Over Small Gravel Mining The Best Road For Regulation?
River Springs Limited Liability Company v. Board of County Commissioners of County of Teton,

1995 Wyo. LEXIS 142

(Wyo. 1995),” see XXXII Land & Water L. Rev. 155 (1997).

For article, “Cooperative Ecosystem Management: Can an Ecosystem Approach Succeed in Wyoming?” see XXXII Land & Water L. Rev. 629 (1997).

For article, “Environmental Audits in Wyoming: A Practitioner's Guide,” see XXXII Land & Water L. Rev. 655 (1997).

For case note, “Environmental Law — Can NEPA and ESA Work Together? Designations of Critical Habitat for an Endangered Species Must Fulfill National Environmental Policy Act Requirements. Catron County Board of County Commissioners v. United States Fish and Wildlife Service, 75 F.3d 1429, 1996 U.S. App. LEXIS 1479 (10th Cir. 1996),” see XXXII Land & Water L. Rev. 677 (1997).

For case note, “Hazardous Waste — The Supreme Court's Interpretation of RCRA: An Inequitable Result. KFC Western, Inc. v. Meghrig, 516 U.S. 479, 116 S. Ct. 1251, 134 L. Ed. 2d 121, 1996 U.S. LEXIS 1955 (1996),” see XXXII Land & Water L. Rev. 699 (1997).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

61B Am. Jur. 2d Pollution Control § 1 et seq.

Tenant's remedy against stranger for wrongful pollution of waters, 12 ALR2d 1192.

Liability for pollution of stream by oil, water, or the like flowing from well, 19 ALR2d 1025.

Liability for pollution of subterranean waters, 38 ALR2d 1265.

Measure and elements of damages for pollution of stream, 49 ALR2d 253.

Validity of regulation of smoke and other air pollution, 78 ALR2d 1305.

Validity and construction of anti-water pollution statutes and ordinances, 32 ALR3d 215.

Liability for injury caused by spraying or dusting of crops, 37 ALR3d 833.

Landowner's right to relief against pollution of his water supply by industrial or commercial waste, 39 ALR3d 910.

Necessity of showing scienter, knowledge, or intent, in prosecution for violation of air pollution or smoke control statute or ordinance, 46 ALR3d 758.

Maintainability in state court of class action for relief against air or water pollution, 47 ALR3d 769.

Validity and construction of statutes, ordinances, or regulations controlling discharge of industrial wastes into sewer system, 47 ALR3d 1224.

Propriety of court's consideration of ecological effects of proposed project in determining right of condemnation, 47 ALR3d 1267.

Validity of legislation permitting administrative agency to fix permissible standards of pollutant emission, 48 ALR3d 326.

Sufficiency of evidence of air pollution control violation in administrative proceeding terminating in abatement order, 48 ALR3d 795.

Preliminary mandatory injunction to prevent, correct, or reduce effects of polluting practices, 49 ALR3d 1239.

Duty and liability as to plugging oil or gas well abandoned or taken out of production, 50 ALR3d 240.

Liability of oil and gas lessee or operator for injuries to or death of livestock, 51 ALR3d 304.

Traffic noise and vibration from highway as element of damages in eminent domain, 51 ALR3d 860.

Evidence as to Ringlemann Chart observations, 51 ALR3d 1026.

Liability of water supplier for damages resulting from furnishing impure water, 54 ALR3d 936.

Right to maintain action to enjoin public nuisance as affected by existence of pollution control agency, 60 ALR3d 665.

Salting for snow removal as taking or damaging abutting property for eminent domain purposes, 64 ALR3d 1239.

Validity and construction of statute or ordinance allowing tax exemption for property used in pollution control, 65 ALR3d 434.

Validity and construction of statute or ordinance requiring return deposits on soft drink or similar containers, 73 ALR3d 1105.

Validity, construction and application of statutes requiring assessment of environmental information prior to grants of entitlements for private land use, 76 ALR3d 388.

Validity of state statutory provision permitting administrative agency to impose monetary penalties for violation of environmental pollution statute, 81 ALR3d 1258.

When statute of limitations begins to run as to cause of action for nuisance based on air pollution, 19 ALR4th 456.

Construction and application of pollution exclusion clause in liability insurance policy, 39 ALR4th 1047.

Validity of local regulation of hazardous waste, 67 ALR4th 822.

Measure and elements of damages for pollution of well or spring, 76 ALR4th 629.

Validity, construction and application of state hazardous waste regulations, 86 ALR4th 401.

Liability insurance coverage for violations of antipollution laws, 87 ALR4th 444.

Infliction of emotional distress: toxic exposure, 6 ALR5th 162.

Recovery of damages for expense of medical monitoring to detect or prevent future disease or condition, 17 ALR5th 327.

Recovery of punitive damages for injuries resulting from transport, handling, and storage of toxic or hazardous substances, 39 ALR5th 763.

Propriety, under Rules 23 (a) and 23 (b) of Federal Rules of Civil Procedure, as amended in 1966, of class action seeking relief against pollution of environment, 7 ALR Fed 907.

Right of private party to maintain qui tam or other action for enforcement of provision of Rivers and Harbors Act of 1899 (33 U.S.C. §§ 407, 411) making it unlawful to deposit refuse in navigable waters and their tributaries, 15 ALR Fed 636.

Construction and application of §§ 101 to 105 of National Environmental Policy Act of 1969 (42 U.S.C. §§ 4331 to 4335) requiring all federal agencies to consider environmental factors in their planning and decision making, 17 ALR Fed 33, 64 ALR Fed 15, 66 ALR Fed 395, 67 ALR Fed 54.

Construction and application of preemption sections (§§ 208, 210 (c) (4)) of Clean Air Act (42 U.S.C. §§ 1857f-6a, 1857f-6c (c) (4)), 18 ALR Fed 971.

Construction and application of § 4 (f) of Department of Transportation Act of 1966 (49 U.S.C. § 1653 (f)), as amended, and § 18 (a) of Federal-Aid Highway Act of 1968 (23 U.S.C. § 138) requiring secretary of transportation to determine that all possible planning for highways has been done to minimize harm to public park and recreation lands, 19 ALR Fed 904.

Validity, under federal constitution, of state statute or local ordinance regulating phosphate content of detergents, 21 ALR Fed 365.

Authority of secretary of army to deny dredging and filling permit for ecological reasons under § 10 of Rivers and Harbors Act of 1899 (33 U.S.C. § 403), 25 ALR Fed 706.

Federal common law of nuisance as basis for relief in environmental pollution cases, 29 ALR Fed 137.

What are “land-use and transportation controls” which may be imposed, under § 100 (a) (2) (B) of Clean Air Act of 1970 (42 U.S.C. § 1857c-5 (a) (2) (B)), to insure maintenance of national primary ambient air quality standards, 30 ALR Fed 156.

Orders or penalties against state or its officials for failure to comply with regulations directing state to regulate pollution-creating activities of private parties, under § 113 of Clean Air Act (42 U.S.C. § 1857c-8), 31 ALR Fed 79.

Necessity and sufficiency of environmental impact statements under § 102(2)(C) of National Environmental Policy Act of 1969 (42 USC § 4332(2)(C)) in cases involving transportation projects, 62 ALR Fed 664.

Necessity and sufficiency of environmental impact statement under § 102(2)(C) of National Environmental Policy Act of 1969 (42 USC § 4332(2)(C)) in cases involving housing and urban renewal projects, 65 ALR Fed 121.

Necessity and sufficiency of environmental impact statements under § 102(2)(C) of National Environmental Policy Act of 1969 (42 USC § 4332(2)(C)) in cases involving herbicide, pesticide and related projects, 74 ALR Fed 249.

Necessity and sufficiency of environmental impact statements under § 102(2)(C) of National Environmental Policy Act of 1969 (42 USC § 4332(2)(C)) in cases involving logging, mining and related projects, 74 ALR Fed 702.

Necessity and sufficiency of environmental impact statements under § 102(2)(C) of National Environmental Policy Act of 1969 (42 USC § 4332(2)(C)) in cases involving hunting, fishing and related projects, 74 ALR Fed 852.

Necessity and sufficiency of environmental impact statements under § 102(2)(C) of National Environmental Policy Act of 1969 (42 USC § 4332(2)(C)) in cases involving defense, military and related projects, 75 ALR Fed 119.

Necessity and sufficiency of environmental impact statements under § 102(2)(C) of National Environmental Policy Act of 1969 (42 USC § 4332(2)(C)) in cases involving park, recreational, wilderness and related projects, 75 ALR Fed 738.

State or local regulation of toxic substances as pre-empted by Toxic Substances Control Act (15 USC § 2601 et seq.), 84 ALR Fed 913.

Third-party defense to liability under § 107 of Comprehensive Environmental Response, Compensation and Liability Act (42 USC § 9607), 105 ALR Fed 21.

Right to maintain action based on violation of § 7003 of Resource Conservation and Recovery Act (42 USC § 6973) pertaining to imminent hazards from solid or hazardous waste, 105 ALR Fed 800.

What are “necessary costs of response” within meaning of § 107(a)(4)(B) of Comprehensive Environmental Response, Compensation, and Liability Act (CERCLA) (42 USC § 9607(a)(4)(B)), 113 ALR Fed 1.

Arranger liability of sellers pursuant to § 107(a)(3) of Comprehensive Environmental Response, Compensation, and Liability Act (CERCLA) (42 USC § 9607(a)(3)), 125 ALR Fed 315.

Liability of generators pursuant to § 107(a)(3) of Comprehensive Environmental Response, Compensation, and Liability Act (CERCLA) (42 USC § 9607(a)(3)), 126 ALR Fed 265.

What constitutes “disposal” for purposes of owner or operator liability under § 107(a)(2) of Comprehensive Environmental Response, Compensation, and Liability Act (CERCLA) (42 USC § 9607(a)(2)), 136 ALR Fed 117.

Indemnification or release agreement as covering liability under § 107(A) of Comprehensive Environmental Response, Compensation, and Liability Act (CERCLA) (42 USC § 9607(a)), 139 ALR Fed 123.

Private entity's status as owner or operator under § 107(a)(1, 2) of Comprehensive Environmental Response, Compensation, and Liability Act (42 USC § 9607(a)(1, 2) (CERCLA), 140 ALR Fed 181.

Application of statute of limitations (42 USC § 9613(g)(2)) in action under § 107 of Comprehensive Environmental Response, Compensation, and Liability Act (CERCLA) for recovery of costs for removal and or remedial action, 142 ALR Fed 115.

Construction and application of statute of limitations (42 USC § 9613(g)(1)) for action under § 107 of Comprehensive Environmental Response, Compensation, and Liability Act (CERCLA) (42 USC § 9607) for natural resource damages, 144 ALR Fed 285.

Award of costs and attorney's fees in judicial review of administrative proceedings under § 307(f) of Clean Air Act (42 U.S.C. § 7607(f), 146 ALR Fed 531.

What constitutes “facility” within meaning of § 101(9) of the Comprehensive, Environmental Response, Compensation, and Liability Act (CERCLA) (42 U.S.C. § 9601(9)), 147 ALR Fed 469.

Equitable considerations in allocating response costs to owner or occupant of previously contaminated facility in action pursuant to § 113(f) of Comprehensive Environmental Response, Compensation, and Liability Act (CERCLA)(42 U.S.C. § 9613(f), 148 ALR Fed 203.

39A C.J.S. Health and Environment § 61 et seq.